italian.dict
abbrancare/ABCGKOSVY1
accampare/ABCGKOSVY1
accertare/ABCGKOSVY1z
accoppiare/ABCGKOSVY1
acutizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
adocchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
affienare/ABCGKOSVY1
agghiaiare/ABCGKOSVY1
agguerrire/ABCGKOSVY1
alleggerire/ABCGKOSVY1
alternare/ABCGKOSVY1
ammiccare/ABCGKOSVY1
anatematizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
annunciare/ABCGKOSVY1
appellare/ABCGKOSVY1
approcciare/ABCGKOSVY1
arguire/ABCGKOSVY1
arrogare/ABCGKOSVY1
aspettare/ABCGKOSVY1
assoggettare/ABCGKOSVY1
attergare/ABCGKOSVY1
auspicare/ABCGKOSVY1
autotrasportare/ABCGKOSVY1
avvolticchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
ballonzolare/ABCGKOSVY1
basare/ABCGKOSVY1
bestemmiare/ABCGKOSVY1
biutare/ABCGKOSVY1
braccare/ABCGKOSVY1
brutalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
cagionare/ABCGKOSVY1
cangiare/ABCGKOSVY1
carburare/ABCGKOSVY1
cavare/ABCGKOSVY1
chiazzare/ABCGKOSVY1
classicizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
collocare/ABCGKOSVY1z
compensare/ABCGKOSVY1
concimare/ABCGKOSVY1
confortare/ABCGKOSVY1
consultare/ABCGKOSVY1z
controbattere/ABCGKOSVY1
corroborare/ABCGKOSVY1
cristallizzare/ABCGKOSVY1z
debellare/ABCGKOSVY1
decomprimere/ABCGKOTWY1
defluire/ABCGKOSVY1
demilitarizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
deplorare/ABCGKOSVY1
desiderare/ABCGKOSVY1
dialogare/ABCGKOSVY1
dimagrire/ABCGKOSVY1
disancorare/ABCGKOSVY1
disequilibrare/ABCGKOSVY1
disistimare/ABCGKOSVY1
dissertare/ABCGKOSVY1
divincolare/ABCGKOSVY1
duplicare/ABCGKOSVY1
ellenizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
eradicare/ABCGKOSVY1
esercire/ABCGKOSVY1
essiccare/ABCGKOSVY1
evadere/ABCGKOSVY1
fatare/ABCGKOSVY1
fidanzare/ABCGKOSVY1
fluorizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
fotocomporre/ABCGKOSVY1
frignare/ABCGKOSVY1
gabbare/ABCGKOSVY1
gerarchizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
giovare/ABCGKOSVY1
gorgogliare/ABCGKOSVY1
grecizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
idolatrare/ABCGKOSVY1
imbecillire/ABCGKOSVY1
imbracciare/ABCGKOSVY1
immelensire/ABCGKOSVY1
impaperare/ABCGKOSVY1
impensierire/ABCGKOSVY1
impipare/ABCGKOSVY1
impulciare/ABCGKOSVY1
incacare/ABCGKOSVY1
incarcerare/ABCGKOSVY1
incedere/ABCGKOSVY1
inciuchire/ABCGKOSVY1z
incrostare/ABCGKOSVY1
indolenzire/ABCGKOSVY1
infeudare/ABCGKOSVY1
infoltire/ABCGKOSVY1
ingalluzzire/ABCGKOSVY1
ingombrare/ABCGKOSVY1
innamorare/ABCGKOSVY1
insediare/ABCGKOSVY1
intanare/ABCGKOSVY1
internare/ABCGKOSVY1
intoscanire/ABCGKOSVY1
inurbare/ABCGKOSVY1
invitare/ABCGKOSVY1
irrigidire/ABCGKOSVY1
lacerare/ABCGKOSVY1
legiferare/ABCGKOSVY1
litigare/ABCGKOSVY1
maggiorare/ABCGKOSVY1
marginalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
mediare/ABCGKOSVY1
metamorfosare/ABCGKOSVY1
miscelare/ABCGKOSVY1
monetizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
municipalizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
nicotinizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
obnubilare/ABCGKOSVY1
oppugnare/ABCGKOSVY1
ossidare/ABCGKOSVY1
pagare/ABCGKOSVY1
parametrizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
pastorizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
pendolare/1ABCGKOSVYa
perquisire/ABCGKOSVY1
pigiare/ABCGKOSVY1z
plagiare/ABCGKOSVY1
porfirizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
predare/ABCGKOSVY1
prenotare/ABCGKOSVY1
privatizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
prolungare/ABCGKOSVY1
prueggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
querelare/ABCGKOSVY1
raccosciare/ABCGKOSVY1
raffrenare/ABCGKOSVY1
ramazzare/ABCGKOSVY1
rappigliare/ABCGKOSVY1
ravvicinare/ABCGKOSVY1
refilare/ABCGKOSVY1
reintegrare/ABCGKOSVY1
retinare/ABCGKOSVY1
riacutizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
riapparecchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
ribellare/ABCGKOSVY1
riciclare/ABCGKOSVY1
ricoverare/ABCGKOSVY1
riequilibrare/ABCGKOSVY1
rifugiare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimaneggiare/ABCGKOSVY1
rimodellare/ABCGKOSVY1
rinavigare/ABCGKOSVY1
rinfittire/ABCGKOSVY1
rinsecchire/ABCGKOSVY1
rinzaffare/ABCGKOSVY1
ripubblicare/ABCGKOSVY1
risocializzare/ABCGKOSVY1
risuonare/ABCGKOSVY1
riversare/ABCGKOSVY1
rubacchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
salinare/1ABCGKOSVYa
saziare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbendare/ABCGKOSVY1
sbraitare/ABCGKOSVY1
scadenzare/ABCGKOSVY1
scanalare/ABCGKOSVY1
scarognire/ABCGKOSVY1
scheletrire/ABCGKOSVY1
sciamare/ABCGKOSVY1
scoperchiare/ABCGKOSVY1
secolarizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
sferire/ABCGKOSVY1
sgelare/ABCGKOSVY1
sincopare/ABCGKOSVY1
smoccolare/ABCGKOSVY1
solvatare/ABCGKOSVY1
sottopagare/ABCGKOSVY1
spartire/ABCGKOSVY1
spifferare/ABCGKOSVY1
spumare/ABCGKOSVY1
stazionare/ABCGKOSVY1
stralodare/ABCGKOSVY1
stupire/ABCGKOSVY1
svaporare/ABCGKOSVY1
tamburare/ABCGKOSVY1
teologizzare/ABCGKOSVY1
torturare/ABCGKOSVY1
trasandare/ABCGKOSVY1
trivellare/ABCGKOSVY1
urtare/ABCGKOSVY1
vessare/ABCGKOSVY1
xerocopiare/ABCGKOSVY1
